Massachusetts, session 194th, S2048.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 5 of Chapter 59 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting the following paragraph:- Fifty-ninth. Notwithstanding other
provisions of this chapter or any general or special law to the contrary, upon acceptance of this
paragraph by a city or a town, the board of assessors shall annually reduce the property tax on
the real property of a person who has reached his sixty-fifth birthday before the fiscal year for
which the tax is due, and have lived in the city or town for 25 years or longer, to the amount of
tax due on the property in the fiscal year prior to the person reaching age 65, if the person
occupies the real estate as his domicile or occupies the same jointly with his spouse.
of 1